apertium-pl-uk.pl.dix
    <pardef n="BASE__statek">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ek</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kowi</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kiem</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ku</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ku</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ki</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ków</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kom</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kami</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kach</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ek</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ki</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ki</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="BASE__bat">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ta</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>towi</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tem</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cie</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cie</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PBASE__bat_pl"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ba/t__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__bat"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="BASE__hit">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="mi"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PBASE__hit_sg"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PBASE__bat_pl"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="hi/t__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__hit"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="amety/st__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>st</l>
          <r>st<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>stu</l>
          <r>st<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>stowi</l>
          <r>st<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>st</l>
          <r>st<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>stem</l>
          <r>st<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ście</l>
          <r>st<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ście</l>
          <r>st<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>st</l>
          <r>st<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PBASE__bat_pl"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="BASE__ząb">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ąb</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ęba</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>owi</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ąb</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>em</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ębie</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ębie</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ęb</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PBASE__bat_pl"/>
      </e>
   </pardef>
    <pardef n="BASE__ser">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>owi</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>em</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ze</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ze</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="mi"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PBASE__bat_pl"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ser__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__ser"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="z/ąb__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ąb<s n="n"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__ząb"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="stat/ek__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ku</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__statek"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="młot/ek__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ka</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ków</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__statek"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="nagietek"><i>nagiet</i><par n="młot/ek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="andradyt"><i>andrady</i><par n="hi/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="batyst"><i>baty</i><par n="amety/st__n"/></e>
    <e lm="blankiet"><i>blankie</i><par n="hi/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="burek"><i>bur</i><par n="młot/ek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dopisek"><i>dopis</i><par n="stat/ek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fiołek"><i>fioł</i><par n="młot/ek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gest"><i>ge</i><par n="amety/st__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gradient"><i>gradien</i><par n="hi/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kotlet"><i>kotle</i><par n="ba/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="młot"><i>mło</i><par n="ba/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="papierek"><i>papier</i><par n="młot/ek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="paszport"><i>paszpor</i><par n="hi/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pet"><i>pe</i><par n="ba/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rdest"><i>rde</i><par n="amety/st__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ryneczek"><i>rynecz</i><par n="stat/ek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="silniczek"><i>silnicz</i><par n="młot/ek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trzonek"><i>trzon</i><par n="młot/ek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="wałek"><i>wał</i><par n="młot/ek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zrostek"><i>zrost</i><par n="młot/ek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="świst"><i>świ</i><par n="amety/st__n"/></e>
    <e lm="areszt"><i>aresz</i><par n="hi/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="balast"><i>bala</i><par n="amety/st__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kieliszek"><i>kielisz</i><par n="młot/ek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="odpoczynek"><i>odpoczyn</i><par n="stat/ek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pagórek"><i>pagór</i><par n="młot/ek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rumianek"><i>rumian</i><par n="stat/ek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="odłamek"><i>odłam</i><par n="młot/ek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="przeżytek"><i>przeżyt</i><par n="stat/ek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="podtekst"><i>podtek</i><par n="amety/st__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cement"><i>cemen</i><par n="hi/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="manifest"><i>manife</i><par n="amety/st__n"/></e>
    <e lm="olejek"><i>olej</i><par n="stat/ek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="preparat"><i>prepara</i><par n="hi/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="docinek"><i>docin</i><par n="młot/ek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="popart"><i>popar</i><par n="hi/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pretekst"><i>pretek</i><par n="amety/st__n"/></e>
    <e lm="incydent"><i>incyden</i><par n="hi/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="wydatek"><i>wydat</i><par n="stat/ek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="duplikat"><i>duplika</i><par n="hi/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="holocaust"><i>holocau</i><par n="amety/st__n"/></e>
    <e lm="relikt"><i>relik</i><par n="hi/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kontrast"><i>kontra</i><par n="amety/st__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dogmat"><i>dogma</i><par n="hi/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="protest"><i>prote</i><par n="amety/st__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tekst"><i>tek</i><par n="amety/st__n"/></e>
    <e lm="wzrost"><i>wzro</i><par n="amety/st__n"/></e>
    <e lm="departament"><i>departamen</i><par n="hi/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kontrakt"><i>kontrak</i><par n="hi/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zwrot"><i>zwro</i><par n="hi/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="odcinek"><i>odcin</i><par n="młot/ek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dworek"><i>dwor</i><par n="stat/ek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pojedynek"><i>pojedyn</i><par n="stat/ek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spoczynek"><i>spoczyn</i><par n="stat/ek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="czosnek"><i>czosn</i><par n="stat/ek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="podatek"><i>podat</i><par n="stat/ek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="upadek"><i>upad</i><par n="stat/ek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="wyjątek"><i>wyjąt</i><par n="stat/ek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="but"><i>bu</i><par n="ba/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="czworokąt"><i>czworoką</i><par n="ba/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="karat"><i>kara</i><par n="ba/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kąt"><i>ką</i><par n="ba/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ośmiokąt"><i>ośmioką</i><par n="ba/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prostokąt"><i>prostoką</i><par n="ba/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="wat"><i>wa</i><par n="ba/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="wielokąt"><i>wieloką</i><par n="ba/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="wolt"><i>wol</i><par n="ba/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fagot"><i>fago</i><par n="hi/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="szczyt"><i>szczy</i><par n="hi/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pępek"><i>pęp</i><par n="młot/ek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="środek"><i>środ</i><par n="młot/ek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="języczek"><i>języcz</i><par n="młot/ek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bat"><i>ba</i><par n="ba/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ametyst"><i>amety</i><par n="amety/st__n"/></e>
    <e lm="chwast"><i>chwa</i><par n="amety/st__n"/></e>
    <e lm="toast"><i>toa</i><par n="amety/st__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ząb"><i>z</i><par n="z/ąb__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ser"><i>ser</i><par n="ser__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trójkąt"><i>trójką</i><par n="ba/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bajt"><i>baj</i><par n="ba/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stożek"><i>stoż</i><par n="stat/ek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="statek"><i>stat</i><par n="stat/ek__n"/></e>
